Nebraska, session 109, LB196.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 60-6,356, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-6,356 (1) An all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type vehicle shall not be
operated on any controlled-access highway with more than two marked traffic
lanes. The crossing of any controlled-access highway with more than two marked
traffic lanes shall not be permitted except as provided in subsections (9) and
(10) of this section. Subsections (2), (3), and (5) through (8) of this section
authorize and apply to operation of an all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type
vehicle only on a highway other than a controlled-access highway with more than
two marked traffic lanes.
(2) An all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type vehicle may be operated in
accordance with the operating requirements of subsection (3) of this section:
(a) Outside the corporate limits of a city, village, or unincorporated
village if incidental to the vehicle's use for agricultural purposes;
(b) Within the corporate limits of a city or village if authorized by the
city or village by ordinance adopted in accordance with this section; or
(c) Within an unincorporated village if authorized by the county board of
the county in which the unincorporated village is located by resolution in
accordance with this section.
(3)(a) (3) An all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type vehicle may be
operated as authorized in subsection (2) of this section when such operation
occurs:
(i) Between only between the hours of sunrise and sunset; or .
(ii) Between the hours of sunset and sunrise for purposes of snow removal
within the corporate limits of a city or village or within an unincorporated
village.
(b) Any person operating an all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type vehicle
as authorized in subsection (2) of this section shall:
(i) Have have a valid Class O operator's license or a farm permit as
provided in section 60-4,126;
(ii) Have , shall have liability insurance coverage for the all-terrain
vehicle or a utility-type vehicle while operating such the all-terrain vehicle
or a utility-type vehicle on a highway; , and
(iii) Not shall not operate the all-terrain or utility-type such vehicle
at a speed in excess of thirty miles per hour.
(c) The person operating an the all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type
vehicle shall provide proof of such insurance coverage to any peace officer
requesting such proof within five days of such a request.
(d) When operating an all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type vehicle as
authorized in subsection (2) of this section, the headlight and taillight of
the vehicle shall be on and the vehicle shall be equipped with a bicycle safety
flag which extends not less than five feet above ground attached to the rear of
such vehicle. The bicycle safety flag shall be triangular in shape with an area
of not less than thirty square inches and shall be day-glow in color.
(4) All-terrain vehicles and utility-type vehicles may be operated without
complying with subsection (3) of this section on highways in parades which have
been authorized by the State of Nebraska or any department, board, commission,
or political subdivision of the state.
(5) The crossing of a highway other than a controlled-access highway with
more than two marked traffic lanes shall be permitted by an all-terrain vehicle
or a utility-type vehicle without complying with subsection (3) of this section
only if:
(a) The crossing is made at an angle of approximately ninety degrees to
the direction of the highway and at a place where no obstruction prevents a
quick and safe crossing;
(b) The vehicle is brought to a complete stop before crossing the shoulder
or roadway of the highway;
(c) The operator yields the right-of-way to all oncoming traffic that
constitutes an immediate potential hazard;
(d) In crossing a divided highway, the crossing is made only at an
intersection of such highway with another highway; and
(e) Both the headlight and taillight of the vehicle are on when the
crossing is made.
(6) All-terrain vehicles and utility-type vehicles may be operated outside
the corporate limits of any municipality by electric utility personnel within
the course of their employment in accordance with the operation requirements of
-1-

LB196 LB196
2025 2025
subsection (3) of this section, except that the operation of the vehicle
pursuant to this subsection need not be limited to the hours between sunrise
and sunset.
(7) A city or village may adopt an ordinance authorizing the operation of
all-terrain vehicles and utility-type vehicles within the corporate limits of
the city or village if the operation is in accordance with subsection (3) of
this section. The city or village may place other restrictions on the operation
of all-terrain vehicles and utility-type vehicles within its corporate limits.
(8) A county board may adopt a resolution authorizing the operation of
all-terrain vehicles and utility-type vehicles within any unincorporated
village within the county if the operation is in accordance with subsection (3)
of this section. The county may place other restrictions on the operation of
all-terrain vehicles and utility-type vehicles within the unincorporated
village.
(9) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, the crossing of
a controlled-access highway with more than two marked traffic lanes shall be
permitted by a utility-type vehicle if the operation is in accordance with the
operation requirements of subsection (3) of this section and if the following
requirements are met:
(a) The crossing is made at an intersection that:
(i) Is controlled by a traffic control signal; or
(ii) For any intersection located outside the corporate limits of a city
or village, is controlled by stop signs;
(b) The crossing at such intersection is made in compliance with the
traffic control signal or stop signs; and
(c) The crossing at such intersection is specifically authorized as
follows:
(i) If such intersection is located within the corporate limits of a city
or village, by ordinance of such city or village;
(ii) If such intersection is located within an unincorporated village, by
resolution of the county board of the county in which such unincorporated
village is located; or
(iii) If such intersection is located outside the corporate limits of a
city or village and outside any unincorporated village, by resolution of the
county board of the county in which such intersection is located.
(10) When the use of the all-terrain vehicle or utility-type vehicle is
for an agricultural purpose, the crossing of a controlled-access highway with
more than two marked traffic lanes shall be permitted if such vehicle is
operated in accordance with subsection (3) of this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 60-6,356, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is repealed.
-2-